District of Columbia statutes.
4-218.04

Prosecutions; subpoenas; witness fees; perjury; compulsion of obedience to subpoena; oaths.

(a)

In addition to any power to bring criminal or civil actions or otherwise carry out the duties under this chapter, the Corporation Counsel shall have the authority to issue subpoenas for a witness to appear and testify or to produce all books, records, papers, or documents in any investigation into alleged violations of this chapter.

(b)

A witness, other than those employed by the District of Columbia, summoned under subsection (a) of this section shall be paid the same fees and mileage that a witness is paid in the Superior Court of the District of Columbia (“Superior Court”), but the fees need not be tendered to the witness before he or she appears and testifies or produces books, records, papers, or documents.

(c)

Any willful false swearing on the part of any witness testifying about a material fact pursuant to a subpoena issued under subsection (a) of this section shall be subject to prosecution pursuant to Chapter 24 of Title 22.

(d)

If any witness, who has been personally summoned, neglects or refuses to obey the subpoena, the Corporation Counsel may report this fact to the Superior Court. The Superior Court may compel obedience to the subpoena to the same extent as a witness may be compelled to obey the subpoenas of that court.

(e)

The Corporation Counsel may administer oaths to any witness summoned in any investigation under subsection (a) of this section.

Apr. 6, 1982, D.C. Law 4-101, § 1804
as added Apr. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 12-254,§ 2(b), 46 DCR 1276
1981 Ed., § 3-218.4.